Hawaii, session 2026, GM1171.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Section 291E-31, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§291E-31 Notice of administrative revocation; effect. As
used in this part, the notice of administrative revocation:
(1) Establishes that the respondent's license and
privilege to operate a vehicle in the State or on or
in the waters of the State shall be [terminated:]
administratively revoked:
(A) Thirty days after the date the notice of
administrative revocation is issued in the case
of an alcohol related offense;
(B) Forty-four days after the date the notice of
administrative revocation is issued in the case
of a drug related offense; or
(C) [Such] If the respondent requests an
administrative hearing, then at a later date as
2026-3395 HB2417 CDl HMSO

iiniiiHRiiiiiiiiiniiiimii

Page 2 2417
H.B. NO
H.D. 2
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
is established by the director under section
291E-38,
[■i^] unless and until the director [adminiotrativcly
revokes the rcspondent---s ■licGnoc and privilogc;]
rescinds the administrative revocation;
(2) Establishes the date on which administrative
revocation proceedings against the respondent were
initiated;
(3) Serves as a temporary permit, if applicable, to
operate a vehicle as provided in section 291E-33; and
(4) Notifies the respondent that the respondent shall
obtain an ignition interlock permit and keep an
ignition interlock device installed and operating in
any vehicle the respondent operates during the
revocation period if the respondent had a valid
license at the time of the arrest."
SECTION 2. Section 291E-34, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsections (c) through (i) to read as
follows;
"(c) The notice shall provide, at a minimum, the following
information relating to the administrative review:
2026-3395 HB2417 CDl HMSO

■■mHMiiiiiiiin

Page 3 2417
H.B. NO.
H.D. 2
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
(1) That the review is automatic;
(2) That the respondent, within three days of the issuance
of the notice of administrative revocation in the case
of an alcohol related offense and within seventeen
days of the issuance of the notice of administrative
revocation in the case of a drug related offense, may
submit written information demonstrating why the
respondent's license and privilege to operate a
vehicle should not be administratively revoked;
(3) The address location, or electronic mailing
address where the respondent may submit the
information;
(4) That the respondent is not entitled to be present or
represented at the administrative review; and
(5) That the administrative review decision shall be
mailed to the respondent:
(A) No later than [eight] fourteen days after the
date of the issuance of the notice of
administrative revocation in the case of an
alcohol related offense; and
2026-3395 HB2417 CDl HMSO

■HIHIIIIIIMIIIHHIII

Page 4 2417
H.B. NO.
H.D. 2
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
(B) No later than [twenty-two] twenty-eight days
after the date of the issuance of the notice of
administrative revocation in the case of a drug
related offense [—12.
provided that if the administrative review decision is
not mailed to the respondent within such period, the
administrative revocation shall take effect thirty
days or forty-four days after the date the notice of
administrative revocation was issued, as applicable,
unless and until the director rescinds the
administrative revocation.
(d) The notice shall state that, if [the respondent'o
license and privilege to operate a vehicle- io not
admi-n-iotrativol-y revoked] after the review, the [respondent' o
license shall bo returned,—unless -a subsequent -aA-eohol or drug
enforcement contact has occurred,—along with] director rescinds
the administrative revocation, the respondent shall be given a
certified statement that the administrative revocation
proceedings have been terminated[—] and, unless a subsequent
alcohol or drug enforcement contact has occurred, the
respondent's license shall be returned.
2026-3395 HB2417 CDl HMSO

iHiiiiiiiiiiiiniiiiiin

Page 5
H.B. NO. --
C.D. 1
(e) The notice shall state that, if the administrative
review affirms the revocation of the respondent's license and
privilege to operate a vehicle [io adminlGtrntivcly revoked
, a review decision shall be mailed to the
respondent, or to the parent or guardian of the respondent if
the respondent is under the age of eighteen, that shall contain,
at a minimum, the following information:
(1) The reasons why revocation of the respondent's license
and privilege to operate a vehicle is
[adminiotrativoly revoked;] affirmed;
(2) That the respondent may request the director, within
six days of the date the review decision is mailed, to
schedule an administrative hearing to review the
administrative revocation;
(3) That, if the respondent's request for an
administrative hearing is received by the director
within six days of the date the review decision was
mailed, the hearing shall be scheduled to commence:
(A) No later than twenty-five days after the date of
the issuance of the notice of administrative
2026-3395 HB2417 CDl HMSO


Page 6
H.B. NO. --
C.D. 1
revocation in the case of an alcohol related
offense; and
(B) No later than thirty-nine days after the date of
the issuance of the notice of administrative
revocation in the case of a drug related offense;
(4) The procedure to request an administrative hearing;
That failure to request an administrative hearing
within the time provided shall cause the
administrative revocation to [take] remain in effect
[-for the -period and] under the conditions established
by the director in the review decision;
That the respondent may regain the right to a hearing
by requesting the director, within sixty days after
the issuance of the notice of administrative
revocation, to schedule a hearing;
(7) That the director shall schedule the hearing to
commence no later than thirty days after the date a
request under paragraph (6) is received, but that.
except as provided in section 291E-38(j), the
temporary permit shall not be extended if the
respondent fails to request an administrative hearing
2026-3395 HB2417 CDl HMSO
iniiiiMiiiMiiiinniiia 6

Page 7
H.B. NO.
I .i-x. 'a g
C.D. 1
within the initial six-day period provided for that
purpose;
(8) That failure to attend the hearing shall cause the
administrative revocation to [take] remain in effect
for the period and under the conditions indicated;
(9) The duration of the administrative revocation and
other conditions that may be imposed, including [-j-]
referral to the driver's education program for an
assessment of the respondent's substance abuse or
dependence and the need for treatment; and
(10) That the respondent shall obtain an ignition interlock
permit in order to operate a vehicle during the
revocation period if the respondent had a valid
license at the time of the arrest.
(f) The notice shall provide, at a minimum, the following
information relating to administrative hearings:
(1) That the respondent shall have six days from the date
the administrative review decision was mailed to
request that an administrative hearing be scheduled;
(2) That a request for an administrative hearing and
payment of a $30 fee, unless waived pursuant to
2026-3395 HB2417 CDl HMSO
innmiiiiiiiniiiiiiiiiiii

Page 8 2417
H.B. NO
H.D. 2
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
section 291E-39, shall entitle the respondent to
review and copy, [prior to] before the hearing, all
documents that were considered at the administrative
review, including the arrest report and the sworn
statements;
(3) That the respondent may be represented by an attorney,
submit evidence, give testimony, and present and
cross-examine witnesses;
(4) That, in cases where the respondent is under the age
of eighteen, a parent or guardian must be present; and
(5) That a written hearing decision shall be mailed no
later than five days after completion of the hearing.
(g) The notice shall state that, if the administrative
revocation is [rcvorscd] rescinded after the hearing, the
[respondent’s liconoG shall bO' returned,—along with] respondent
shall be given a certified statement that the administrative
revocation proceedings have been terminated[—] and, unless a
subsequent alcohol or drug enforcement contact has occurred, the
respondent's license shall be returned.
(h) The notice shall state that, if the administrative
revocation is [eastaifted] affirmed at the hearing, a written
2026-3395 HB2417 CDl HMSO

Page 9
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
hearing decision shall be mailed to the respondent, or to the
parent or guardian of the respondent if the respondent is under
the age of eighteen, that shall contain, at a minimum, the
following information:
(1) The effective date of the administrative revocation;
(2) The duration of the administrative revocation;
(3) Other conditions that may be imposed by law, including
the use of an ignition interlock device; and
(4) The right to obtain judicial review.
(i) The notice shall state that failure of the respondent,
or of the parent or guardian of the respondent if the respondent
is under the age of eighteen, to attend a scheduled hearing
shall cause the administrative revocation to [trake] remain in
effect as provided in the administrative review decision."
SECTION 3. Section 291E-36, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows:
"(a) Whenever a respondent has been arrested for a
violation of section 291E-61 or 291E-61.5 and submits to a test
that establishes: the respondent's alcohol concentration was
.08 or more; the presence, in the respondent's blood or urine,
of any drug that is capable of impairing the respondent's
2026-3395 HB2417 CDl HMSO

Page 10 H.B. NO. S';
C.D. 1
ability to operate a vehicle in a careful and prudent manner; or
whenever a respondent has been involved in a collision resulting
in injury or death and a blood or urine test performed pursuant
to section 291E-21 establishes that the respondent's alcohol
concentration was .08 or more or establishes the presence in the
respondent's blood or urine of any drug that is capable of
impairing the respondent's ability to operate a vehicle in a
care'ful and prudent manner, the following shall be forwarded
immediately to the director;
, (1) A copy of the arrest report or the report of the law
enforcement officer who issued the notice of
administrative revocation to the person involved in a
collision resulting in injury or death and the sworn
statement of the arresting law enforcement officer or
the officer who issued the notice of administrative
revocation, stating facts that establish that:
(A) There was reasonable suspicion to stop the
vehicle, the vehicle was stopped at an intoxicant
control roadblock established and operated in
compliance with sections 291E-19 and 291E-20, or
2026-3395 HB2417 CDl HMSO

■liiiiiMiiinninnii

Page 11 H.B. NO.
^0'2
C.D, 1
the respondent was tested pursuant to section
291E-21;
(B) There was probable cause to believe that the
respondent had been operating the vehicle while
under the influence of an intoxicant; and
(C) The respondent agreed to be tested or the person
was tested pursuant to section 291E-21;
(2) In a case involving an alcohol related offense, the
sworn statement of the person responsible for
maintenance of the testing equipment, stating facts
that establish that, pursuant to section 321-161 and
rules adopted thereunder:
(A) The equipment used to conduct the test was
approved for use as an alcohol testing device in
this State;
(B) The person had been trained and at the time the
test was conducted was certified and capable of
maintaining the testing equipment; and
(C) The testing equipment used had been properly
maintained and was in good working condition when
the test was conducted;
2026-3395 HB2417 GDI HMSO

■■■HllflIIIIIRIIilil

Page 12
H.B. NO. --
C.D. 1
(3) In a case involving an alcohol related offense, the
sworn statement of the person who conducted the test,
stating facts that establish that, pursuant to section
321-161 and rules adopted thereunder;
(A) The person was trained and at the time the test
was conducted was certified and capable of
operating the testing equipment;
(B) The person followed the procedures established
for conducting the test;
(C) The equipment used to conduct the test functioned
in accordance with operating procedures and
indicated that the respondent's alcohol
concentration was at, or above, the prohibited
level; and
(D) The person whose breath or blood was tested is
the respondent;
(4) In a case involving a drug related offense, the sworn
statement of the person responsible for maintenance of
the testing equipment, stating facts that establish
that, pursuant to section 321-161 and rules adopted
thereunder;
2026-3395 HB2417 CDl HMSO

■iiiiiiiiiiiwiiiiiniin

Page 13
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(A) The equipment used to conduct the test was
approved for use in drug testing;
(B) The person [conducting the tost] had been trained
and, at the time of the test, was certified and
capable of maintaining the testing equipment; and
(C) The testing equipment used had been properly
maintained and was in good working condition when
the test was conducted;
(5) In a case involving a drug related offense, the sworn
statement of the person who conducted the test,
stating facts that establish that, pursuant to section
321-161 and rules adopted thereunder:
(A) At the time the test was conducted, the person
was trained and capable of operating the testing
equipment;
(B) The person followed the procedures established
for conducting the test;
(C) The equipment used to conduct the test functioned
in accordance with operating procedures and
indicated the presence of one or more drugs or
2026-3395 HB2417 CDl HMSO
iiNiuiiniiniiuniiiii

Page 14
H.B. NO.
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
their metabolites in the respondent's blood or
urine; and
(D) The person whose blood or urine was tested is the
respondent;
(6) A copy of the notice of administrative revocation
issued by the law enforcement officer to the
respondent;
(7) Any license taken into possession by the law
enforcement officer; and
(8) A listing of any prior alcohol or drug enforcement
contacts involving the respondent."
SECTION 4. Section 291E-37, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended as follows:
1. By amending subsections (a) and (b) to read:
"(a) The director shall automatically review the issuance
of a notice of administrative revocation and shall issue a
written review decision [administratively revoking] affirming
administrative revocation of the license and privilege to
operate a vehicle or rescinding the notice of administrative
revocation. The written review decision shall be mailed to the
2026-3395 HB2417 CDl HMSO

iniiiniiiiHHiiiviHiiiii

Page 15
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
respondent, or to the parent or guardian of the respondent if
the respondent is under the age of eighteen, no later than:
(1) Fourteen days after the date the notice was issued in
a case involving an alcohol related offense; or
(2) Twenty-eight days after the date the notice was issued
in a case involving a drug related offense.
(b) The respondent shall have the opportunity to
demonstrate in writing why the respondent's license and
privilege to operate a vehicle should not be administratively
revoked and, within three days of receiving the notice of
administrative revocation, as provided in section 291E-33, shall
submit any written information[7—either] by mail, electronic
mail, or in person, to the director's office or to any office or
address designated by the director for that purpose."
2. By amending subsections (d) through (g) to read:
"(d) The director shall [adminiatratively revoke] affirm
the administrative revocation of the respondent's license and
privilege to operate a vehicle if the director determines that:
(1) There existed reasonable suspicion to stop the
vehicle, the vehicle was stopped at an intoxicant
control roadblock established and operated in
2026-3395 HB2417 CDl HMSO 1

Page 16 2417
H.B. NO
H.D. 2
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
compliance with sections 291E-19 and 291E-20, or the
person was tested pursuant to section 291E-21;
(2) There existed probable cause to believe that the
respondent operated the vehicle while under the
influence of an intoxicant; and
(3) The evidence proves by a preponderance that:
(A) The respondent operated the vehicle while under
the influence of an intoxicant; or
(B) The respondent operated the vehicle and refused
to submit to a breath, blood, or urine test after
being informed:
(i) That the person may refuse to submit to
testing in compliance with section 291E-11;
and
(ii) Of the sanctions of this part and then asked
if the person still refuses to submit to a
breath, blood, or urine test, in compliance
with the requirements of section 291E-15.
(e) If the evidence does not support administrative
revocation, the director shall rescind the notice of
administrative revocation [and return tho respondent's licenoG
i 2 m 026 i - m 339 M 5 H H B24 ii 1 i 7 i M CDl i n H i M i S H O 1

Page 17
H.B. NO.
S.D. 1
C.D, 1
along with], provide a certified statement that administrative
revocation proceedings have been terminated[—],.and, unless a
subsequent alcohol or drug enforcement contact has occurred,
return the respondent's license.
(f) If the director [administratively rovokcs] affirms the
administrative revocation of the respondent's license and
privilege to operate a vehicle, the director shall mail a
written review decision'to the respondent, or to the parent or
guardian of the respondent if the respondent is under the age of
eighteen. The written review decision shall;
(1) State the reasons for the administrative revocation;
(2) Indicate that the respondent has six days from the
date the written review decision is mailed to request
an administrative hearing to [-review] contest the
director's written review decision;
(3) Explain the procedure by which to request an
administrative hearing;
(4) Be accompanied by a form, postage prepaid, that the
respondent may fill out and mail in order to request
an administrative hearing;
2026-3395 HB2417 CDl HMSO

Page 18 2417
H.B. NO.
H.D. 2
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
(5) Inform the respondent of the.right to review and copy
all documents considered at the review, including the
arrest report and the sworn statements of law
enforcement officers or other persons, [prior to]
before the hearing; and
(6) State that the respondent may be represented by
counsel at the hearing, submit evidence, give
testimony, and present and cross-examine witnesses,
including the arresting law enforcement officer.
(g) Failure of the respondent to request a hearing within
the time provided in section 291E-38(a) shall cause the
administrative revocation to [take] remain in effect for the
period and under the conditions provided in the administrative
review decision issued by the director under this section. The
respondent may regain the right to an administrative hearing by
requesting the director, within sixty days of the issuance of
the notice of administrative revocation as provided in section
291E-33, to schedule an administrative hearing. The
administrative hearing shall be scheduled to commence no
later than thirty days after the date the request for hearing is
received by the director. The administrative review decision
2026-3395 HB2417 CDl HMSO

IIIMIIIMilllillOliHII

Page 19 H.B. NO. "o-
C.D. 1
issued by the director under this section shall explain clearly
the consequences of failure to request an administrative hearing
and the procedure by which the respondent may regain the right
to a hearing."
SECTION 5. Section 291E-38, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows:
" (a) If the director [adm-inistrative-ly—re-v-okos-] affirms
the administrative revocation of the respondent's license and
privilege to operate a vehicle after the administrative review,
the respondent may request an administrative hearing to review
the administrative review decision within six days of the date
the administrative review decision is mailed. If the request
for hearing is received by the director within six days of the
date the review decision is mailed, the hearing shall be
scheduled to commence no later than:
(1) Twenty-five days from the date the notice of
administrative revocation was issued in a case
involving an alcohol related offense; or
(2) Thirty-nine days from the date the notice of
administrative revocation was issued in a case
involving a drug related offense.
2026-3395 HB2417 CDl HMSO ]

Page 20
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
The director may continue the hearing only as provided in
subsection (j) ."
SECTION 6. Section 291E-41, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows:
"(a) Unless an administrative revocation is [reversed]
rescinded or the temporary permit is extended by the director,
administrative revocation shall become effective on the day
specified in the notice of administrative revocation. Except as
provided in section 291E-44.5, no license to operate a vehicle
shall be restored under any circumstances during the
administrative revocation period. Upon completion of the
administrative revocation period, the respondent may reapply and
be reissued a license pursuant to section 291E-45."
SECTION 7. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 8. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2026-3395 HB2417 CDl HMSO


2417
H.B. NO
H.D. 2
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 3rd day of June , 2026
GO'^RNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 2417, HD 2, SD 1, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 2417, H.D. 2, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
134-26